Washington statutes.
RCW 26.27.481

Service of petition and order.

Except as otherwise provided in RCW 26.27.501, the petition and order must be served, by any method authorized by the law of this state, upon the respondent and any person who has physical custody of the child.

[ 2001 c 65 s 309.]